Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.540

Treasurer—Deputy treasurer. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals appointed by a candidate or political or incidental committee, pursuant to RCW 29B.25.040, to perform the duties specified in that section.

[ 2024 c 164 s 254.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.